Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.60.040

Enforcement—Attorney general. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1)(a) The attorney general may bring civil actions in the name of the state for any appropriate civil remedy, including but not limited to the special remedies provided in RCW 29B.60.010 upon:

(i) Referral by the commission pursuant to RCW 29B.60.020(4);

(ii) Receipt of a notice provided in accordance with RCW 29B.60.020(5); or

(iii) Receipt of a notice of intent to commence a citizen's action, as provided under RCW 29B.60.060(3).

(b) Within 45 days of receiving a referral from the commission or notice of the commission's failure to take action provided in accordance with RCW 29B.60.020(5), or within 10 days of receiving a citizen's action notice, the attorney general must publish a decision whether to commence an action on the attorney general's office website. Publication of the decision within the 45 day period, or ten-day period, whichever is applicable, shall preclude a citizen's action pursuant to RCW 29B.60.060.

(c) The attorney general should use the enforcement powers in this section in a consistent manner that provides guidance in complying with the provisions of this title to candidates, political committees, or other individuals subject to the regulations of this title.

(2) The attorney general may investigate or cause to be investigated the activities of any person who there is reason to believe is or has been acting in violation of this title, and may require any such person or any other person reasonably believed to have information concerning the activities of such person to appear at a time and place designated in the county in which such person resides or is found, to give such information under oath and to produce all accounts, bills, receipts, books, paper and documents which may be relevant or material to any investigation authorized under this title.

(3) When the attorney general requires the attendance of any person to obtain such information or produce the accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents that may be relevant or material to any investigation authorized under this title, the attorney general shall issue an order setting forth the time when and the place where attendance is required and shall cause the same to be delivered to or sent by registered mail to the person at least 14 days before the date fixed for attendance. The order shall have the same force and effect as a subpoena, shall be effective statewide, and, upon application of the attorney general, obedience to the order may be enforced by any superior court judge in the county where the person receiving it resides or is found, in the same manner as though the order were a subpoena. The court, after hearing, for good cause, and upon application of any person aggrieved by the order, shall have the right to alter, amend, revise, suspend, or postpone all or any part of its provisions. In any case where the order is not enforced by the court according to its terms, the reasons for the court's actions shall be clearly stated in writing, and the action shall be subject to review by the appellate courts by certiorari or other appropriate proceeding.

[ 2024 c 164 s 493; 2019 c 428 s 39; 2018 c 304 s 14; 2010 c 204 s 1004; 2007 c 455 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 27; 1973 c 1 s 40 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.765, 42.17.400.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.